Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2695.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4378(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4378. Assistance recipients to seek support.(a) Seeking support required.--[Prior] Except as provided under subsection (a.1), prior to authorization, every applicant for assistance whose circumstances include the reported absence of a legally responsible relative from the household or the presence of a putative father shall appear before the domestic relations section or other applicable division of the court of common pleas. Upon the request of a family court or domestic 123456789101112131415161718 relations section, the secretary is authorized to waive the requirement of personal appearance before a family court or domestic relations section if another procedure would be as efficient and effective. Subject to Federal approval, only when necessary, assistance shall not be authorized by the department until it has been certified that the applicant has cooperated in determining paternity and enforcing support.(a.1) Cooperation by nonparents of relative children.--(1) Subject to Federal approval and only when necessary, an applicant for assistance who is a nonparent of a relative child may choose whether to cooperate in seeking and obtaining support payments for a relative child with respect to whom the assistance is claimed if:(i) the parent is suffering from or in recovery from drug or alcohol addiction;(ii) the parent suffers from a mental health problem;(iii) the parent's whereabouts are unknown to the nonparent relative caregiver;(iv) the parent is incarcerated or otherwise institutionalized;(v) the parent has been convicted of a crime;(vi) the parent is deceased;(vii) the nonparent relative is eligible to file for custody, has filed for custody or has received an adjudication awarding custody of the child;(viii) the nonparent relative is exercising care and control of the child as a result of action taken by a children and youth social service agency; or(ix) the nonparent relative has been awarded 20260HB2695PN3762 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guardianship of the child.(2) The department shall accept as verification a self-attestation of the nonparent applicant on a form provided by the department that one or more of the factors under paragraph (1) are met.(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blood relative." An individual of whole or half blood."Fifth degree of kinship." A great-great grandparent, great-great-great grandparent and other relationship prefixed by great, great-great, grand or great-grand. The term does not include a second cousin or more remote cousin."First cousin once removed." The child of an individual's first cousin or the first cousin of an individual's parent."Nonparent of a relative child." In relation to a dependent child, a grandparent, step-grandparent or other blood relative who is within the fifth degree of kinship to the dependent child, including a first cousin once removed.* * *Section 2. Sections 4379(1)(iv) and 4380(a) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 4379. Cooperation required.In accordance with a child support plan approved by the Federal Government, the department shall have the power and its duty shall be to:(1) Require as a condition of eligibility for assistance that an applicant or recipient:* * *20260HB2695PN3762 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) [Cooperate] Subject to section 4378(a.1) (relating to assistance recipients to seek support), cooperate in obtaining support payments for such applicant or recipient and for a child with respect to whom such assistance is claimed or in obtaining any other payment or property due such applicant, recipient or such child unless the department determines that the applicant or recipient has good cause for failing to do so.* * *§ 4380. Enforcement of cooperation requirements.(a) Cooperation required.--It is essential to the effective and responsible utilization of assistance funds that applicants and recipients who are caretakers of a child whose circumstances include the reported absence of a legally responsible relative from the household or presence of a putative father cooperate fully with the department and the court or domestic relations section in establishing paternity and in securing child support payments and in all matters set forth in section 4379 (relating to cooperation required), subject to section 4378(a.1) (relating to assistance recipients to seek support).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20260HB2695PN3762 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122